apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="lycka/s__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nde</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ndes</l>      <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ö__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ör</l>        <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ött</l>       <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öende</l>     <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öendes</l>    <r>ö<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="forts/ätta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ätta</l>      <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätter</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätts</l>      <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätt</l>       <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ättande</l>   <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ättandes</l>  <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

<pardef n="hur__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="var__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aldrig__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/å__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärre</l>      <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärst</l>      <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ofta__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/väl__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>väl</l>       <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bättre</l>    <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bäst</l>      <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lite__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>lite</l>      <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindre</l>    <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>minst</l>     <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/ycket__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ycket</l>     <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="rätt__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Less frequent
<pardef n="rät/t__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rä/tt__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ddare</l>     <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ddast</l>     <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

<pardef n="eller__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="att__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="när__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

<pardef n="på__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="precis"><i>precis</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nog"><i>nog</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="andas"><i>anda</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brottas"><i>brotta</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dö"><i>d</i><par n="d/ö__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vistas"><i>vista</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misslyckas"><i>misslycka</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konfronteras"><i>konfrontera</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kortas"><i>korta</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lyckas"><i>lycka</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hoppas"><i>hoppa</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="låtsas"><i>låtsa</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förutom">         <i>förutom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="via">             <i>via</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="trots">           <i>trots</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="av">              <i>av</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kring">           <i>kring</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="omkring">         <i>omkring</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="utanför">         <i>utanför</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="genom">           <i>genom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ovan">            <i>ovan</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="för">             <i>för</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inför">           <i>inför</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="for">             <i>for</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="hos">             <i>hos</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="i">               <i>i</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="om">              <i>om</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="före">            <i>före</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="över">            <i>över</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="innan">           <i>innan</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="under">           <i>under</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="vid">             <i>vid</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inifrån">         <i>inifrån</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="till">            <i>till</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ur">              <i>ur</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ovanpå">          <i>ovanpå</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ner">             <i>ner</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="mot">             <i>mot</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="emellan">         <i>emellan</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inom">            <i>inom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="bland">           <i>bland</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="utan">            <i>utan</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nära">            <i>nära</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="igenom">          <i>igenom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="framför">         <i>framför</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="även om">         <i>även<b/>om</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="eller">           <i>eller</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="men">             <i>men</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="och">             <i>och</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="samt">            <i>samt</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="utan">            <i>utan</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="både">            <i>både</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="såsom">           <i>såsom</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="liksom">          <i>liksom</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="såväl">           <i>såväl</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="att">             <i>att</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="som">             <i>som</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="eftersom">        <i>eftersom</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="för">             <i>för</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="så">              <i>så</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="där">             <i>där</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="antingen">        <i>antingen</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="när">             <i>när</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="då">              <i>då</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="för">             <i>för</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="om">              <i>om</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="just">            <i>just</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="medan">           <i>medan</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="till">            <i>till</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="till exempel">    <i>till<b/>exempel</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="nej">             <i>nej</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="alldeles">        <i>alldeles</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="endast">          <i>endast</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hellre">          <i>hellre</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ibland">          <i>ibland</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mera">            <i>mera</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="snart">           <i>snart</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="troligtvis">      <i>troligtvis</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ytterligare">     <i>ytterligare</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="numera">          <i>numera</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="trots">           <i>trots</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="icke">            <i>icke</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ej">              <i>ej</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="här">             <i>här</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="också">           <i>också</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in">              <i>in</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emellan">         <i>emellan</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bort">            <i>bort</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="cirka">           <i>cirka</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kvar">            <i>kvar</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kring">           <i>kring</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="i går">           <i>i<b/>går</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="var">             <i>var</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="först">           <i>först</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="därefter">        <i>därefter</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="redan">           <i>redan</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="länge">           <i>länge</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nog">             <i>nog</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="heller">          <i>heller</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="däremot">         <i>däremot</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ursprungligen">   <i>ursprungligen</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="än">              <i>än</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nu">              <i>nu</i><par n="var__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lite">            <i></i><par n="/lite__adv"/></e>
<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ofta">            <i>ofta</i><par n="ofta__adv"/></e>
<e lm="väl">             <i></i><par n="/väl__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mycket">          <i>m</i><par n="m/ycket__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rä</i><par n="rä/tt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rät</i><par n="rät/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rätt</i><par n="rätt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hur">             <i>hur</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vad">             <i>vad</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lyckas">          <i>lycka</i><par n="lycka/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dö">              <i>d</i><par n="d/ö__vblex"/></e>
